Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.82.190

Catalytic converters—Trafficking in the first degree. (Effective April 1, 2025.)

(1) A person is guilty of trafficking in catalytic converters in the first degree if the person knowingly:

(a) Traffics seven or more catalytic converters that have been removed from a motor vehicle, without fulfilling the requirements under chapter 46.79 or 46.80 RCW for lawful transfer; or

(b) Purchases a catalytic converter that has been removed from a motor vehicle, without possessing a valid scrap processor license under chapter 46.79 RCW or vehicle wrecker license under chapter 46.80 RCW.

(2) Trafficking in catalytic converters in the first degree is a class C felony.

[ 2024 c 301 s 24.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2024 c 301: See notes following RCW 9A.82.180.